Alaska statutes. Title 2. Aeronautics.
Article 1. Aeronautics Functions.

Sec. 02.15.010.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to encourage and develop aeronautics and the establishment and operation of a state system of airports through cooperation with municipalities, and otherwise, including cooperation with the federal government and acceptance and utilization of federal funds allotted for this purpose.

History.

(§ 2 ch 123 SLA 1949; am § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, paragraph references were removed to reflect the 2001 repeal of former paragraph (1).

Administrative Code. —

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

Sec. 02.15.020.
Powers of department.

The department may perform acts, issue and amend orders, adopt reasonable general or special regulations and procedures, and establish minimum standards, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, as it considers necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

The department may enter into contracts necessary or advisable to the execution of the powers granted it by this chapter. Where the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of an airport or air navigation facility is financed wholly or partially with federal money, the department, as agent of the state, or of a municipality, or person, may let contracts in the manner prescribed by the federal authorities acting under the laws and rules and regulations of the United States.

The department may accept federal money and money from other public or private sources to accomplish in whole or in part any of the purposes of this chapter. All federal money accepted under this chapter shall be accepted and expended by the department upon the terms and conditions prescribed by the United States.

History.

(§ 4 A — C ch 123 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in subsection (a), “and” was deleted after “amend orders” to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Cross references. —

For regulation of noise at airports, see AS

34.75.030

.

Administrative Code. —

For utility permits, see 17 AAC 15, art. 1.

For utility standards and requirements, see 17 AAC 15, art. 2.

For utility relocation and installation, see 17 AAC 15, art. 3.

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

For authorization for use of international airport property, see 17 AAC 42, art. 2.

For competitive award, see 17 AAC 42, art. 3.

For public notice; lease, permit, and concession terms and cancellation, see 17 AAC 42, art. 4.

For Ted Stevens Anchorage International Airport tiedown permits, see 17 AAC 42, art. 5.

For Fairbanks International Airport tiedown permits, see 17 AAC 42, art. 6.

For airport closure and construction, see 17 AAC 42, art. 7.

For first amendment activity at international airports, see 17 AAC 42, art. 8.

For rural airports generally, see 17 AAC 45, art. 1.

For authorization for use of rural airport property, see 17 AAC 45, art. 2.

For competitive award, see 17 AAC 45, art. 3.

For public notice; lease, permit, and concession terms; insurance; and cancellation, see 17 AAC 45, art. 4.

For assigned-space aircraft parking, see 17 AAC 45, art. 5.

For transient and open aircraft parking, see 17 AAC 45, art. 6.

For airport closure; disposal of state-owned airport property, see 17 AAC 45, art. 7.

For first amendment activity at rural airports, see 17 AAC 45, art. 8.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A regional school board may not require the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities to transfer title to the land and buildings it occupies on airport property to the regional school board pursuant to AS

14.08.151

(B). That section is in conflict with AS

02.15.020

, related to creation and operation of airports, which requires compliance with relevant federal law. December 11, 2001 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 02.15.030.
Conformity to federal law.

The department may not adopt a regulation, order, or standard that is inconsistent or contrary to any act of the Congress of the United States or regulations promulgated or standards established. A regulation, order, or standard may not be adopted that duplicates any current rules or regulations issued by a federal agency, or that applies to aircraft, airports, or air navigation facilities owned or operated by the federal government.

History.

(§ 4 C, D ch 123 SLA 1949)

Collateral references. —

8A Am. Jur. 2d, Aviation, §§ 13 et seq., 27.

Sec. 02.15.040.
Cooperation with federal agencies.

The department shall cooperate with the Federal Emergency Management Agency, the armed forces of the United States government, and the Federal Aviation Administration for the purpose of coordinating aviation activities in carrying out the civil defense program.

History.

(§ 4 E ch 123 SLA 1949; added by § 2 ch 76 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 “Federal Emergency Management Agency” was substituted for “Department of Civil Defense” to correct and update the reference to the federal agency.

Sec. 02.15.050.
Miscellaneous powers and duties of department.

The department may confer with and hold joint hearings with agencies of the United States in connection with matters arising under this chapter or relating to the sound development of aeronautics.

The department may avail itself of the cooperation, services, records, and facilities of the agencies of the United States as fully as may be practicable in the administration and enforcement of this chapter. The department shall, upon request, furnish to the agencies of the United States its cooperation, services, records, and facilities, insofar as may be practicable.

The department or a state or municipal police officer shall report to the appropriate agency of the United States all accidents in aeronautics in this state of which it or the police officer is informed, and shall, insofar as practicable, preserve, protect, and prevent the removal of the component parts of an aircraft involved in an accident being investigated until the federal agency institutes an investigation.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

The department may report to the appropriate federal agencies and agencies of states proceedings instituted charging violation of any sections of this chapter and penalties, of which it has knowledge, imposed upon an airman or the owner or operator of an aircraft for violation of the law of this state relating to aeronautics, or for violation of the regulations or orders of the department. The department may receive reports of penalties and other data from agencies of the federal government and states and, when necessary, enter into agreements with federal agencies and the agencies of states governing the delivery, receipt, exchange, and use of reports and data. The department may make the reports and data available to a court of this state and to a state or municipal officer authorized to enforce the aeronautics laws.

The department may draft and recommend suitable legislation to advance the interests of the state in aeronautics; represent the state in aeronautical matters before the federal agencies and other state agencies; and participate as party plaintiff or defendant on behalf of the state or as intervenor in a controversy that involves the interests of the state in aeronautics.

The department may acquire data on passenger enplanements from air carriers; however, the department may not obtain passenger manifests from air carriers except for matters concerning public safety.

History.

(§§ 8 C 10 ch 123 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1987; am § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

For rural airports generally, see 17 AAC 45, art. 1.